District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.84

Forfeiture of the position of Attorney General.

The occurrence of any of the following shall result in automatic forfeiture of the position of Attorney General for the District of Columbia:

(1)

Failure to maintain the qualifications required under § 1-301.83(a);

(2)

Violation of the prohibition against the private practice of law as provided in § 1-301.83(b); or

(3)

Conviction of a felony while in office.

History

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 104, 57 DCR 3012